transducers/ckt_full/verb.lexd
<prog><aor><a_sg1><o_pl3>    т{ы}> >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><aor><a_pl1><o_pl3>  мыт{ы}> >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><aor><a_sg2><o_pl3>        : >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><aor><a_pl2><o_pl3>        : >{ы}ркыни{·}>ткы
<prog><aor><a_sg3><o_pl3>        : >{ы}ркыни{·}>н{Æ}т
<prog><aor><a_pl3><o_pl3>    н{Æ}> >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т

#
#
<prog><fut><a_sg2><o_sg1>  р{Æ}>ин{Æ}>   >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><fut><a_pl2><o_sg1>  р{Æ}>ин{Æ}>   >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
<prog><fut><a_sg3><o_sg1>  р{Æ}>ин{Æ}>   >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><fut><a_pl3><o_sg1>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>гым

#
#
<prog><fut><a_sg2><o_pl1>  р{Æ}>         >ткуркыни{·}
<prog><fut><a_pl2><o_pl1>  р{Æ}>         >ткуркыни{·}>тык
<prog><fut><a_sg3><o_pl1>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>мык
<prog><fut><a_pl3><o_pl1>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>мык

<prog><fut><a_sg1><o_sg2>  т{ы}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт
<prog><fut><a_pl1><o_sg2>  мыт{ы}>р{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт
#
#
<prog><fut><a_sg3><o_sg2>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт
<prog><fut><a_pl3><o_sg2>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт

<prog><fut><a_sg1><o_pl2>  т{ы}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
<prog><fut><a_pl1><o_pl2>  мыт{ы}>р{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
#
#
<prog><fut><a_sg3><o_pl2>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
<prog><fut><a_pl3><o_pl2>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык

<prog><fut><a_sg1><o_sg3>  т{ы}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><fut><a_pl1><o_sg3>  мыт{ы}>р{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><fut><a_sg2><o_sg3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><fut><a_pl2><o_sg3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>ткы
<prog><fut><a_sg3><o_sg3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>н
<prog><fut><a_pl3><o_sg3>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}

<prog><fut><a_sg1><o_pl3>  т{ы}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><fut><a_pl1><o_pl3>  мыт{ы}>р{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><fut><a_sg2><o_pl3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><fut><a_pl2><o_pl3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>ткы
<prog><fut><a_sg3><o_pl3>       р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><fut><a_pl3><o_pl3>  н{Æ}>р{Æ}>    >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т

#
#
<prog><intn><a_sg2><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><intn><a_pl2><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
<prog><intn><a_sg3><o_sg1>  ин{Æ}>н{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><intn><a_pl3><o_sg1>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>гым

#
#
<prog><intn><a_sg2><o_pl1>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ткуркыни{·}
<prog><intn><a_pl2><o_pl1>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ткуркыни{·}>тык
<prog><intn><a_sg3><o_pl1>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>мык
<prog><intn><a_pl3><o_pl1>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>мык

<prog><intn><a_sg1><o_sg2>        м{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт
<prog><intn><a_pl1><o_sg2>      мын{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт
#
#
<prog><intn><a_sg3><o_sg2>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт
<prog><intn><a_pl3><o_sg2>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>гыт

<prog><intn><a_sg1><o_pl2>        м{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
<prog><intn><a_pl1><o_pl2>      мын{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
#
#
<prog><intn><a_sg3><o_pl2>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык
<prog><intn><a_pl3><o_pl2>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>тык

<prog><intn><a_sg1><o_sg3>        м{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><intn><a_pl1><o_sg3>      мын{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><intn><a_sg2><o_sg3>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><intn><a_pl2><o_sg3>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>ткы
<prog><intn><a_sg3><o_sg3>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>н
<prog><intn><a_pl3><o_sg3>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}

<prog><intn><a_sg1><o_pl3>        м{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><intn><a_pl1><o_pl3>      мын{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><intn><a_sg2><o_pl3>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><intn><a_pl2><o_pl3>        ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>ткы
<prog><intn><a_sg3><o_pl3>        н{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>н{Æ}т
<prog><intn><a_pl3><o_pl3>         ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т

#
#
<prog><cond><a_sg2><o_sg1>       ъ{ы}>ин{Æ}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><cond><a_pl2><o_sg1>       ъ{ы}>ин{Æ}>ӄ{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}тык
<prog><cond><a_sg3><o_sg1>       ъ{ы}>ин{Æ}>н{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><cond><a_pl3><o_sg1>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}гым

#
#
<prog><cond><a_sg2><o_pl1>             ъ{ы}>н{ы}>  >{ы}ткуркыни{·}
<prog><cond><a_pl2><o_pl1>             ъ{ы}>н{ы}>  >{ы}ткуркыни{·}>тык
<prog><cond><a_sg3><o_pl1>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}мык
<prog><cond><a_pl3><o_pl1>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}мык

<prog><cond><a_sg1><o_sg2>             ъ{ы}>м{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}гыт
<prog><cond><a_pl1><o_sg2>           ъ{ы}>мын{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}гыт
#
#
<prog><cond><a_sg3><o_sg2>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}гыт
<prog><cond><a_pl3><o_sg2>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}гыт

<prog><cond><a_sg1><o_pl2>             ъ{ы}>м{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}тык
<prog><cond><a_pl1><o_pl2>           ъ{ы}>мын{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}тык
#
#
<prog><cond><a_sg3><o_pl2>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}тык
<prog><cond><a_pl3><o_pl2>              ъ{ы}>ыʼн>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{ы}тык

<prog><cond><a_sg1><o_sg3>             ъ{ы}>м{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><cond><a_pl1><o_sg3>           ъ{ы}>мын{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><cond><a_sg2><o_sg3>             ъ{ы}>н{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}
<prog><cond><a_pl2><o_sg3>             ъ{ы}>н{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>ткы
<prog><cond><a_sg3><o_sg3>             ъ{ы}>н{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>н
<prog><cond><a_pl3><o_sg3>             ъ{ы}>н{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}

<prog><cond><a_sg1><o_pl3>             ъ{ы}>м{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><cond><a_pl1><o_pl3>           ъ{ы}>мын{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><cond><a_sg2><o_pl3>             ъ{ы}>н{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т
<prog><cond><a_pl2><o_pl3>             ъ{ы}>н{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>ткы
<prog><cond><a_sg3><o_pl3>             ъ{ы}>н{ы}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>н{Æ}т
<prog><cond><a_pl3><o_pl3>             ъ{ы}>н{Æ}>  >{ы}ркыни{·}>{Æ}т

<stat><perf><a_sg2><o_sg1> ин{Æ}> >{I}гыт
<stat><perf><a_pl2><o_sg1> ин{Æ}> >{ы}тури
<stat><perf><a_sg3><o_sg1> ин{Æ}> >{ы}ԓин
<stat><perf><a_pl3><o_sg1>      : >{I}гым
 
<stat><perf><a_sg2><o_pl1> : >{ы}тку>{I}гыт
<stat><perf><a_pl2><o_pl1> : >{ы}тку>{ы}тури
<stat><perf><a_sg3><o_pl1> : >{ы}мури
<stat><perf><a_pl3><o_pl1> : >{ы}мури
 
<stat><perf><o_sg2> : >{I}гыт
 
<stat><perf><a_1><o_pl2> : >{I}гыт
<stat><perf><a_3><o_pl2> : >{ы}тури
 
<stat><perf><o_sg3> : >{ы}ԓин
<stat><perf><o_pl3> : >{ы}ԓинэт
 
 
<stat><hab><a_sg2><o_sg1> ин{Æ}> >{I}гыт
<stat><hab><a_pl2><o_sg1> ин{Æ}> >{ы}тури
<stat><hab><a_sg3><o_sg1> ин{Æ}> >{ы}ӄин
<stat><hab><a_pl3><o_sg1> : >{I}гым
 
<stat><hab><a_sg2><o_pl1> : >{ы}ткуйгыт
<stat><hab><a_pl2><o_pl1> : >{ы}ткутури
<stat><hab><a_sg3><o_pl1> : >{ы}мури
<stat><hab><a_pl3><o_pl1> : >{ы}мури
 
<stat><hab><a_sg1><o_2> ин{Æ}> >{I}гым
<stat><hab><a_pl1><o_2> ин{Æ}> >{ы}мури
<stat><hab><a_3><o_sg2> : >{I}гыт
<stat><hab><a_3><o_pl2> : >{ы}тури
 
<stat><hab><a_sg1><o_3> ин{Æ}> >{I}гым
<stat><hab><a_pl1><o_3> ин{Æ}> >{ы}мури
<stat><hab><a_sg2><o_3> ин{Æ}> >{I}гыт
<stat><hab><a_pl2><o_3> ин{Æ}> >{ы}тури
 
<stat><hab><a_sg3><o_sg3> ин{Æ}> >{ы}ӄин
<stat><hab><a_pl3><o_sg3> : >{ы}ӄин
 
<stat><hab><a_sg3><o_pl3> ин{Æ}> >{ы}ӄин{Æ}т
<stat><hab><a_pl3><o_pl3> : >{ы}ӄин{Æ}т
